Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB646.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 218A.100 is amended to read as follows:
The cabinet[ for Health and Family Services] shall place a substance in Schedule IV if:
(1) It finds that:
(a)[(1)] The substance has a low potential for abuse relative to substances in
Schedule III;
(b)[(2)] The substance has currently accepted medical use in treatment in the
United States; and
(c)[(3)] Abuse of the substance may lead to limited physical dependence or
psychological dependence relative to the substances in Schedule III; or
(2) The substance is an abortion-inducing drug as defined in KRS 311.7731.
Section 2. KRS 218A.1413 is amended to read as follows:
Page 2 of 11
XXXX 2/12/2026 5:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 496
(1) A person is guilty of trafficking in a controlled substance in the second degree
when:
(a) He or she knowingly and unlawfully traffics in:
1. Ten (10) or more dosage units of a controlled substance classified in
Schedules I and II that is not a narcotic drug; or specified in KRS
218A.1412, and which is not a synthetic drug, salvia, or marijuana; or
2. Twenty (20) or more dosage units of a controlled substance classified in
Schedule III;
(b) He or she knowingly and unlawfully prescribes, distributes, supplies, or sells
an anabolic steroid for:
1. Enhancing human performance in an exercise, sport, or game; or
2. Hormonal manipulation intended to increase muscle mass, strength, or
weight in the human species without a medical necessity;[ or]
(c) He or she knowingly and unlawfully traffics in any quantity of a controlled
substance specified in paragraph (a) of this subsection in an amount less than
the amounts specified in that paragraph; or
(d) He or she knowingly and unlawfully prescribes, distributes, supplies, sells,
or traffics in any quantity of an abortion-inducing drug as defined in KRS
311.7731.
(2) (a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, any person who
violates the provisions of subsection (1) of this section shall be guilty of a
Class D felony for the first offense and a Class C felony for a second or
subsequent offense.
(b) Any person who violates the provisions of subsection (1)(c) or (d) of this
section shall be guilty of:
1. A Class D felony for the first offense, except that KRS Chapter 532 to
the contrary notwithstanding, the maximum sentence to be imposed
Page 3 of 11
XXXX 2/12/2026 5:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 496
shall be no greater than three (3) years; and
2. A Class D felony for a second offense or subsequent offense.
Section 3. KRS 218A.1415 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of possession of a controlled substance in the first degree when
he or she knowingly and unlawfully possesses:
(a) A controlled substance that is classified in Schedules I or II and is a narcotic
drug;
(b) A controlled substance analogue;
(c) Methamphetamine;
(d) Lysergic acid diethylamide;
(e) Phencyclidine;
(f) Gamma hydroxybutyric acid (GHB), including its salts, isomers, salts of
isomers, and analogues;[ or]
(g) Flunitrazepam, including its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers; or
(h) An abortion-inducing drug.
(2) Possession of a controlled substance in the first degree is a Class D felony subject
to the following provisions:
(a) The maximum term of incarceration shall be no greater than three (3) years,
notwithstanding KRS Chapter 532;
(b) For a person's first or second offense under this section, he or she may be
subject to a period of:
1. Deferred prosecution pursuant to KRS 218A.14151; or
2. Presumptive probation;
(c) Deferred prosecution under paragraph (b) of this subsection shall be the
preferred alternative for a first offense unless the controlled substance is an
abortion-inducing drug; and
(d) If a person does not enter a deferred prosecution program for his or her first or
Page 4 of 11
XXXX 2/12/2026 5:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 496
second offense, he or she shall be subject to a period of presumptive
probation, unless:
1. A court determines the defendant is not eligible for presumptive
probation as defined in KRS 218A.010; or
2. The controlled substance is an abortion-inducing drug.
(3) This section shall not be construed to subject a pregnant woman in possession of
an abortion-inducing drug for her personal use to any criminal conviction or
penalty under this section.
(4) As used in this section, "abortion-inducing drug" has the same meaning as in
KRS 311.7731.
SECTION 4. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 218A IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) A person is guilty of importing an abortion-inducing drug when he or she
knowingly and unlawfully transports any quantity of an abortion-inducing drug
into the Commonwealth by any means with the intent to sell or distribute the
abortion-inducing drug.
(2) Importing an abortion-inducing drug is a Class D felony, and the defendant:
(a) Shall not be eligible for pretrial diversion; and
(b) Shall not be released on probation, shock probation, conditional discharge,
or parole until he or she has served at least eighty-five percent (85%) of the
sentence imposed.
(3) As used in this section, "abortion-inducing drug" has the same meaning as in
KRS 311.7731.
Section 5. KRS 216.302 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of assisted suicide when he or she:
(a) [commits a Class C felony when the person ]Knowingly by force or duress
causes another person to commit or to attempt to commit suicide; or[.]
Page 5 of 11
XXXX 2/12/2026 5:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 496
(b) [(2) A person commits a Class D felony when the person, ]With the purpose
of assisting another person to commit or to attempt to commit suicide,
knowingly and intentionally either:
1.[(a)] Provides the physical means, including any drug, medication, or
other substance by which another person commits or attempts to
commit suicide; or
2.[(b)] Participates in a physical act by which another person commits or
attempts to commit suicide.
(2) Assisted suicide is a Class B felony.
SECTION 6. A NEW SECTION OF KRS 216.300 TO 216.308 IS CREATED
TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) A person is guilty of medically assisted aid in dying when he or she:
(a) Prescribes, dispenses, provides, administers, or assists in the administration
of any drug, medication, or other substance knowing that the drug,
medication, or other substance will be used to cause or hasten the death of
another person;
(b) Participates in or assists in any manner or form relating to the use of any
drug, medication, or other substance knowing that the drug, medication, or
other substance will be used to cause or hasten the death of another person;
or
(c) Coerces, encourages, or pressures another person to request any drug,
medication, or other substance knowing that the drug, medication, or other
substance will be used to cause or hasten a person's death.
(2) Medically assisted aid in dying is a Class B felony.
(3) Any contract, agreement, or provision, including advance directives, insurance
policies, or surrogacy arrangements that would require or permit medically
assisted aid in dying shall constitute a violation of this section.
Page 6 of 11
XXXX 2/12/2026 5:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 496
(4) This section shall not prohibit:
(a) The provision of appropriate pain management, including the use of
medication necessary to alleviate pain or suffering, even if the treatment
may foreseeably, but not intentionally, shorten life;
(b) The withholding or withdrawal of extraordinary or disproportionate
medical treatment that is futile or burdensome, provided basic care
including food, water, and comfort continue to be offered;
(c) Providing palliative care, hospice services, and spiritual support that uphold
the dignity of the person until natural death; or
(d) Compliance with the desires expressed in a medical order for scope of
treatment under KRS 311.6225 or a living will directive under KRS 311.623.
(5) (a) Whenever the death of a person results from a violation of any provision of
this section, damages may be recovered for the death from the person who
caused it, or whose agent or servant caused it.
(b) The action shall be prosecuted by the personal representative of the
deceased.
(c) Damages shall include:
1. Funeral expenses;
2. The cost of administration of the estate of the decedent;
3. The costs of recovery, including attorney's fees and the services of
expert witnesses, and any other costs incurred in the bringing of the
action;
4. Punitive damages; and
5. Any other damages allowed by law.
Section 7. KRS 216.308 is amended to read as follows:
The licensing agency which issued a license or certification to a licensed health care
professional who assists in a suicide in violation of Section 5 of this Act or violates
Page 7 of 11
XXXX 2/12/2026 5:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 496
Section 6 of this Act shall [KRS 216.302 may] revoke the license or certification of that
person upon receipt of:
(1) A copy of the record of the criminal conviction or plea of guilty for a felony
in violation of Section 5 or 6 of this Act[KRS 216.302]; or
(2) A copy of the record of a judgment of contempt of court for violating an
injunction issued pursuant to KRS 216.306.
SECTION 8. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 411 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) In addition to any other remedy provided by law, any person or entity that:
(a) Mails or sends by common carrier any abortion-inducing drug to an
address in this Commonwealth or to a person in this Commonwealth;
(b) Intentionally places an abortion-inducing drug into the stream of commerce
when the person or entity knows or reasonably should know there is a
substantial likelihood that the abortion-inducing drug will be used in this
Commonwealth, or mailed or sent by common carrier to an address or
person in this Commonwealth; or
(c) Knowingly prescribes an abortion-inducing drug to a person in this
Commonwealth, regardless of whether the prescriber was in this
Commonwealth or knew the recipient was in this Commonwealth;
shall be liable for compensatory and punitive damages, court costs, and
reasonable attorney's fees in a civil cause of action brought by the pregnant
woman or her spouse, parent or legal guardian if she is a minor, next friend or
guardian, or estate.
(2) The action may be filed in the Circuit Court of the county where the alleged
violation occurred or the county where the plaintiff resides.
(3) Any person or entity found liable under this section shall be jointly and severally
liable with each other person or entity, if any, found liable under this section for
Page 8 of 11
XXXX 2/12/2026 5:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 496
the damages arising from the same violation under subsection (1) of this section.
(4) In any action under this section, the court may also award any injunctive or other
equitable relief that the court finds appropriate.
SECTION 9. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 216B IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Chemical abortion" means the use or prescription of any abortion-
inducing drug dispensed with the intent to cause the death of the unborn
child;
(b) "Complication" or "abortion complication" has the same meaning as in
KRS 311.7731, but includes any harmful event or adverse outcome to a
patient related to an abortion from an abortion-inducing drug, including:
1. Uterine perforation or other injury or damage to the uterus;
2. Hemorrhage;
3. Failure to actually terminate the pregnancy requiring additional
treatment or surgical procedures that include risks such as uterine
perforation, cervical laceration, or scarring;
4. Aspiration or allergic reactions to anesthesia and abortion-inducing
drugs;
5. Excessive pain or discomfort or nausea;
6. Emotional complications; and
7. Any other adverse event as defined by the Food and Drug
Administration criteria provided in the MedWatch Reporting System;
(c) "Healthcare provider" has the same meaning as in KRS 311.821;
(d) "Physician" has the same meaning as in KRS 311.720; and
(e) "Urgent treatment facility" or "urgent care facility" has the same meaning
as in KRS 216B.405.
Page 9 of 11
XXXX 2/12/2026 5:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 496
(2) Any physician or other healthcare provider who believes or has reason to believe
that a patient presenting for treatment has experienced or is experiencing a
complication arising from the use of an abortion-inducing drug shall provide the
following written statement to the patient:
"If you have recently taken an abortion-inducing drug to terminate a pregnancy,
the Commonwealth of Kentucky wants you to be aware that you, or your
representative as authorized under Section 8 of this Act, may have a private cause
of action against the manufacturer, distributor, or prescriber of the abortion-
inducing drug for your death, any complication or abortion complication as
defined in this section, or other injury you may have sustained as a result of the
use of the abortion-inducing drug, including actual damages, loss of consortium,
pain and suffering, punitive damages, court costs, and reasonable attorney's fees,
as established under Section 8 of this Act. You or your representative may also
have a claim for damages against any abortion pill provider, physician, or
healthcare provider for failure to advise you of possible complications from the
use of an abortion-inducing drug or for failure to advise you of the potential
ability of medical professionals to reverse the effects of a drug-induced abortion
and where to obtain information for assistance in locating a medical professional
that can aid in the reversal of a chemical or drug-induced abortion. IF YOU
HAVE EXPERIENCED COMPLICATIONS AND ARE HERE IN NEED OF
EMERGENCY CARE OR MEDICAL CARE, YOU HAVE THE RIGHT TO
TELL THE HEALTHCARE PROVIDER TREATING YOU THAT YOU HAVE
HAD A CHEMICAL OR DRUG-INDUCED ABORTION. PROVIDING THIS
INFORMATION WILL NOT RESULT IN ANY CRIMINAL OR CIVIL
PENALTY TO YOU AND WILL FURTHER HELP SAVE YOUR LIFE."
(3) Every physician, healthcare provider, emergency room, and urgent treatment
center or urgent care facility shall make copies of the written statement in
Page 10 of 11
XXXX 2/12/2026 5:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 496
subsection (2) of this section available for any patient who may be experiencing a
complication or abortion complication that is reasonably believed to be the result
of the use of an abortion-inducing drug, and each health facility shall designate
and make available appropriate staff to provide this statement to any patient
identified under this section.
(4) The cabinet shall make the written statement in subsection (2) of this section
available on its website in a downloadable format for any person.
Page 11 of 11
XXXX 2/12/2026 5:50 PM Jacketed